Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Subarticle C. Determining the Results of Elections.

§ 23-15-591.
Proclamation of results; sealing of ballot box.

When the votes have been completely and correctly counted and tallied by the poll managers they shall publicly proclaim the result of the election at their box and shall certify in duplicate a statement of the result, the certificate to be signed by the poll managers, one (1) of the certificates to be enclosed in the ballot box, and the other to be delivered to and to be kept by one (1) of the poll managers and to be inspected at any time by any voter who so requests. When the count of the votes and the tally of the votes have been completed, the poll managers shall lock and seal the ballot box, having first placed therein all ballots voted, all spoiled ballots and all unused ballots. There shall also be enclosed one (1) of the duplicate receipts given by the poll manager who received the blank ballots received for that box; and the total ballots voted, and the spoiled ballots, and the unused ballots must correspond in total with the duplicate receipt or else the failure thereof must be perfectly accounted for by a written statement, under oath of the poll managers, which statement must be enclosed in the ballot box. There shall also be enclosed in the box the tally list, the receipt book containing the signed names of the voters who voted; and the number of ballots voted must correspond with the number of names signed in the receipt book.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-19 [Codes, 1942, § 3167; Laws, 1935, ch. 19] repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 333; §23-5-147 [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 5 (6); 1857, ch. 4, art 12; 1871, §§ 370, 371; 1880, § 136; 1892, § 3648; 1906, § 4155; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6789; 1930, § 6238; 1942, § 3267; Laws, 1916, ch. 230; Laws, 1960, ch. 451; Laws, 1964, ch. 511, § 1] repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335; and §23-5-167 [Codes, 1871, § 377; 1880, § 139; 1892, § 3670; 1906, § 4177; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6811; 1930, § 6249; 1942, § 3278] repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 187; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 120, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-593.
Irregularities in ballot box.

When the ballot box is opened and examined by the county executive committee in the case of a primary election, or county election commissioners in the case of other elections, and it is found that there have been failures in material particulars to comply with the requirements of Section 23-15-591 and Section 23-15-895 to such an extent that it is impossible to arrive at the will of the voters at such precinct, the entire box may be thrown out unless it be made to appear with reasonable certainty that the irregularities were not deliberately permitted or engaged in by the poll managers at that box, or by one (1) of them responsible for the wrong or wrongs, for the purpose of electing or defeating a certain candidate or candidates by manipulating the election or the returns thereof at that box in such manner as to have it thrown out; in which latter case the county executive committee, or the county election commission, as appropriate, shall conduct such hearing and make such determination in respect to the box as may appear lawfully just, subject to a judicial review of the matter as elsewhere provided by this chapter. Or the executive committee, or the election commission, or the court upon review, may order another election to be held at that box appointing new poll managers to hold the same.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-19 [Codes, 1942, § 3167; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 333]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 188; Laws, 1987, ch. 499, § 7; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 121, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-595.
Procedure for sealing of ballot box; reopening and resealing.

The box containing the ballots and other records required by this chapter shall, immediately after the ballots have been counted, be delivered by one (1) of the poll managers to the clerk of the circuit court of the county and the clerk shall, in the presence of the poll manager making delivery of the box, place upon the lock of such box a tamper-evident seal. The seals shall be numbered consecutively to the number of ballot boxes used in the election in the county, and the clerk shall keep in a place separate from such boxes a record of the number of the seal of each separate box in the county. The board of supervisors of the county shall pay the cost of providing the seals. Upon demand of the chair of the county executive committee in the case of primary elections, or the county election commissioner in the case of other elections, the boxes and their contents shall be delivered to the county executive committee, or the county election commission, as appropriate, and after such committee or commission, as appropriate, has finished the work of tabulating returns and counting ballots as required by law, the committee or commission, as appropriate, shall return all papers and ballots to the box of the precinct where the election was held, and it shall make redelivery of the boxes and their contents to the circuit clerk who shall reseal the boxes. Upon every occasion the boxes shall be reopened and each resealing shall be done as provided in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-21 [Codes, 1942, § 3168; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495 § 333]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 189; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 122, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-597.
Canvass of returns and announcement of results by executive committee.

The county executive committee shall meet no later than one (1) week from the day following each primary election to receive and canvass the returns that must be made within the time fixed by law for returns of general elections and declare the result, and announce the name of the nominees for county and county district offices and the names of those candidates to be submitted to the second primary. The vote for state, state district offices and legislative offices shall be tabulated by precincts and certified to and returned to the State Executive Committee, such returns to be mailed by registered letter or any safe mode of transmission within thirty-six (36) hours after the returns are canvassed and the result ascertained. The State Executive Committee shall meet one (1) week from the day following the first primary election held for state, state district offices and legislative offices, and shall proceed to canvass the returns and to declare the result, and announce the names of those nominated for the different offices in the first primary and the names of those candidates whose names are to be submitted to the second primary election. The State Executive Committee shall also meet one (1) week from the day on which the second primary election was held and receive and canvass the returns for state and district offices, if any, and legislative offices, if any, voted on in the second primary. An exact and full duplicate of all tabulations by precincts as certified under this section shall be filed with the circuit clerk of the county who shall safely preserve the same in his or her office.

If it is eligible under Section 23-15-266, the county executive committee may enter into a written agreement with the circuit clerk or the county election commission authorizing the circuit clerk or the county election commission to perform any of the duties required of the county executive committee pursuant to this section. Any agreement entered into pursuant to this subsection shall be signed by the chair of the county executive committee and the circuit clerk or the chair of the county election commission, as appropriate. The county executive committee shall notify the State Executive Committee and the Secretary of State of the existence of the agreement.

If it is eligible under Section 23-15-266, the municipal executive committee may enter into a written agreement with the municipal clerk or the municipal election commission authorizing the municipal clerk or the municipal election commission to perform any of the duties required of the municipal executive committee pursuant to this section. Any agreement entered into pursuant to this subsection shall be signed by the chair of the municipal executive committee and the municipal clerk or the chair of the municipal election commission, as appropriate. The municipal executive committee shall notify the State Executive Committee and the Secretary of State of the existence of the agreement.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1942 Code § 3142 [Codes, 1906, § 3705; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6397; 1930, § 5895; repealed by Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 33, and 1986, ch. 495, § 346]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 190; Laws, 2001, ch. 523, § 7; Laws, 2010, ch. 320, § 3; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 123, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-599.
Tabulated statement of party vote.

Within ten (10) days after the first primary election and within ten (10) days after the second primary election, if any, the Chairman of the State Executive Committee shall transmit to the Secretary of State a tabulated statement of the party vote cast in each county and precinct in each county in each state and state district election, and each legislative election for districts consisting of more than one (1) county or parts of more than one (1) county. The statement shall be transmitted by the State Executive Committee on such forms and by such methods as may be required by rules and regulations promulgated by the Secretary of State. The statement shall be filed by the Secretary of State and preserved among the records of his office.

The statement provided for in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall contain a certification signed and dated by the Chairman of the State Executive Committee, which shall read as follows:

“I_______________ , Chairman of the_______________Party State Executive Committee, do hereby certify that, on a majority vote of the_______________Party State Executive Committee, these vote totals for each county and for each candidate are the official vote totals for the election reflected therein.”

Within ten (10) days after the first primary election and within ten (10) days after the second primary election, if any, the county executive committee shall transmit to the Secretary of State a tabulated statement of the party vote cast in their county and each precinct in their county in each election for county and county district office and each election for legislative office for districts containing one (1) county or less. The statement shall be transmitted by the county executive committee on such forms and by such methods as may be required by rules and regulations promulgated by the Secretary of State. The statement shall be filed by the Secretary of State and preserved among the records of his office.

The statement provided for in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall contain a certification signed and dated by the majority of the members of the county executive committee, which shall read as follows:

“We, the undersigned members of the county executive committee, do hereby certify that these vote totals for each candidate are the official vote totals for the election reflected therein.”

HISTORY:
Derived from 1942 Code § 3146 [Codes, 1905, § 3724; Hemingway’s 1917, § 9415; 1930, § 5899; repealed by Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 33, and 1986, ch. 495, § 346]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 191; Laws, 2002, ch. 534, § 2, eff July 29, 2002 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 23-15-600.
Forms for reporting election returns.

All forms to be prescribed by the Secretary of State for the reporting of election returns hereunder shall be either hard copy forms on which precincts are listed horizontally and candidates are listed vertically and/or a web-based system in which these forms, or forms similar to them, are made available to counties electronically.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 534, § 8, eff July 29, 2002 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the addition of this section).

§ 23-15-601.
Canvass of returns and declaration of results by election commissioners; determination of tie vote.

When the result of the election shall have been ascertained by the poll managers they, or one (1) of their number, or some fit person designated by them, shall, on the night of the election, deliver to the election commissioners, at the courthouse, a statement of the whole number of votes given for each person and for what office; and the election commissioners shall canvass the returns, ascertain and declare the result, and, within ten (10) days after the day of the election, shall deliver a certificate of the election to the person having the greatest number of votes for representative in the Legislature of districts composed of one (1) county or less, or other county office, board of supervisors, justice court judge and constable. If it appears that two (2) or more candidates for Representative of the county, or part of the county, or for any county office, board of supervisors, justice court judge or constable standing highest on the list, and not elected, have an equal number of votes, the interested candidates shall appear before the election commissioners within two (2) days after the canvass and the tie shall be determined by a toss of a coin or by lot fairly and publicly drawn, and a certificate of election shall be given accordingly. The foregoing provisions shall apply to Senators, if the county be a senatorial district.

The election commissioners shall transmit to the Secretary of State, on such forms and by such methods as may be required by rules and regulations promulgated by the Secretary of State, a statement of the total number of votes cast in the county for each candidate for each office and the total number of votes cast for such candidates in each precinct in the district in which the candidate ran.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-169 [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 5 (9); 1857, ch. 4, art 13; 1871, § 377; 1880, § 138; 1892, § 3671; 1906, § 4178; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6812; 1930, § 6250; 1942, § 3279; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 27; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 192; Laws, 2002, ch. 534, § 3; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 124, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-603.
Delivery of returns to Secretary of State.

The election commissioners shall, within ten (10) days after the general election, transmit to the Secretary of State, to be filed in his or her office, a statement of the whole number of votes given in their county and the whole number of votes given in each precinct in their county, for each candidate for any office at the election; but the returns of every election for Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, Attorney General, Auditor of Public Accounts, State Treasurer, Commissioner of Insurance and other state officers, shall each be made out separately, sealed up together and transmitted to the seat of government, directed to the Secretary of State, and endorsed the “VOTE FOR STATE OFFICERS,” to be delivered by the Secretary of State to the Speaker of the House of Representatives at the next ensuing session of the Legislature. In addition to the other information required pursuant to this subsection, the returns for state officers shall contain a statement of the whole number of votes given in each House of Representative district or portion thereof for each candidate for state office at the election.

Constitutional amendments shall be voted for at the time fixed by the concurrent resolution. The election, whether held separately or with other elections, shall be conducted, in all respects, as required for elections generally. The election commissioners shall, within ten (10) days after the election, transmit to the Secretary of State a statement of the whole number of votes given in their county and the whole number of votes given in each precinct in their county for or against constitutional amendments.

The statements certified by the election commissioners and transmitted to the Secretary of State, as required by this section, shall be tabulated by the Secretary of State and submitted to each branch of the Legislature, at the session next ensuing. Certified county vote totals shall represent the final results of the election.

The statements required by this section shall contain a certification, signed and dated by a majority of the election commissioners, which shall read as follows:

“We, the undersigned election commissioners, do hereby certify that this statement of the whole number of votes contains the official vote for the election reflected therein.”

The statements required by this section shall be transmitted to the Secretary of State on such forms and by such methods as may be required by rules and regulations promulgated by the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-171 [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 5 (8); 1857, ch. 4, art 14; 1871, § 378; 1880, § 140; 1892, § 3672; 1906, § 4179; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6813; 1930, § 6251; 1942, § 3280; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 28; Laws, 1978, ch. 458, § 17; Laws, 1982, Ex Sess, ch. 17, § 20; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 193; Laws, 2002, ch. 534, § 4; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 125, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-605.
Ascertainment of vote and declaration of results by Secretary of State; determination of tie vote.

The Secretary of State, immediately after receiving the returns of an election, not longer than thirty (30) days after the election, shall sum up the whole number of votes given for each candidate other than candidates for state offices, legislative offices composed of one (1) county or less, county offices and county district offices, according to the statements of the votes certified to him or her and ascertain the person or persons having the largest number of votes for each office, and declare such person or persons to be duly elected; and thereupon all persons chosen to any office at the election shall be commissioned by the Governor; but if it appears that two (2) or more candidates for any district office where the district is composed of two (2) or more counties, standing highest on the list, and not elected, have an equal number of votes, the election shall be decided between the candidates having an equal number of votes by each candidate individually drawing one (1) of the two (2) sealed containers from an opaque bag, under the direction of the Governor and Secretary of State. The containers shall consist of a straw of conspicuous length, and the candidate drawing the container with the longer of the two (2) straws shall be declared the winner.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-173 [Codes, 1857, ch. 4, art 15; 1871, § 378; 1880, § 141; 1892, § 3673; 1906, § 4180; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6814; 1930, § 6252; 1942, § 3281; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 29; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 194; Laws, 2002, ch. 534, § 5; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 126, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-607.
Determination of election for judges of Supreme Court and Court of Appeals.

The election commissioners shall, within ten (10) days after an election for judges of the Supreme Court or Court of Appeals, transmit to the Secretary of State, to be filed in his or her office, a statement of the whole number of votes given in their county, and the whole number of votes given in each precinct in their county, for each candidate for the Office of Judge of the Supreme Court or Court of Appeals, and the Secretary of State shall immediately notify each member of the State Board of Election Commissioners in writing to assemble at his or her office on a day to be fixed by him or her, to be within ten (10) days after the receipt by him or her of such statement, and when assembled pursuant to such notice the State Board of Election Commissioners shall sum up the whole number of votes given for each candidate for judge of the Supreme Court or Court of Appeals according to the total number of votes in each county for each candidate as certified to the Secretary of State, ascertain the person or persons to be elected; and thereupon all persons chosen to such office at the election shall be commissioned by the Governor; but if it appears that two (2) or more candidates for judge of the Supreme Court or Court of Appeals standing highest on the list, and not elected, have an equal number of votes, the election shall be decided between the candidates having an equal number of votes by each candidate individually drawing one (1) of the two (2) sealed containers from an opaque bag, under the direction of the Governor and Secretary of State. The containers shall consist of a straw of conspicuous length, and the candidate drawing the container with the longer of the two (2) straws shall be declared the winner.

The statements required by this section shall contain a certification, signed and dated by a majority of the election commissioners, which shall read as follows:

“We, the undersigned election commissioners, do hereby certify that this statement of the whole number of votes contain the official vote for the election reflected therein.”

The statements required by this section shall be transmitted to the Secretary of State on such forms and by such methods as may be required by rules and regulations promulgated by the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-245 [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6852; 1930, § 6286; 1942, § 3315; Laws, 1916, ch. 161; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 32; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 195; Laws, 1993, ch. 518, § 25; Laws, 2002, ch. 534, § 6; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 127, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-609.
Determination of election in which city or county is entitled to separate representation in legislature.

When a city or part of a county is entitled to separate representation in the Legislature, the election commissioners shall prepare for the election, and shall receive and canvass the returns, declare the result, and transmit it to the Secretary of State, and act in all respects as in other elections.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-175 [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 5 (16); 1857, ch. 4, art 5; 1880, § 131; 1892, § 3641: 1906, § 4148; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6782; 1930, § 6253; 1942, § 3282; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 196; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 128, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-611.
Determination of municipal elections; show cause order may be issued for failure to transmit statement certifying names of persons elected.

In municipal elections, poll managers shall, immediately upon the closing of the polls, count the ballots and ascertain the number of votes cast in each voting precinct for each of the candidates or ballot measures and make a return thereof to the municipal election commissioners. On the day following the election, the election commissioners shall canvass the returns so received from all voting precincts and shall, within six (6) days after the election, deliver to each person receiving the highest number of votes a certificate of election. If it shall appear that any two (2) or more of the candidates receiving the highest number of votes shall have received an equal number of votes, the election shall be decided by a toss of a coin or by lot fairly and publicly drawn under the direction of the election commissioners.

Within six (6) days after any election, the municipal election commissioners shall transmit a statement to the Secretary of State certifying the name or names of the person or persons elected, and such person or persons shall be issued commissions by the Governor. The statement shall also include vote totals for each candidate for each office and vote totals for and against ballot measures, if any, including the vote totals for each candidate and ballot measure in each precinct in the municipality.

The statements required by this subsection (2) shall contain a certification, signed and dated by a majority of the municipal election commissioners, which shall read as follows:

“We, the undersigned municipal election commissioners, do hereby certify that this statement contains the official vote for the election reflected therein.”

The statements required by this subsection (2) shall be transmitted to the Secretary of State on such forms and by such methods as may be required by rules and regulations promulgated by the Secretary of State.

If the statement certifying the names of the persons elected is not transmitted to the Secretary of State as required by this subsection (2), the Secretary of State may issue a show cause order directing the municipal election commissioners to provide to the Secretary of State written response containing the reasons for their failure to transmit the statement. The municipal election commissioners shall file their response to the show cause order with the Secretary of State within five (5) working days after the issuance of the show cause order. If the statement certifying the names of the persons elected is not transmitted to the Secretary of State within five (5) working days after the issuance of the show cause order, the Secretary of State may petition a court of competent jurisdiction to compel the municipal election commissioners to comply with this subsection (2). If the statement certifying the names of the persons elected is received by the Secretary of State within five (5) days after the issuance of the show cause order, a response to the show cause order shall not be required.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §21-11-13 [Codes, 1892, § 3032; 1906, § 3437; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5997; 1930, § 2599; 1942, § 3374-65; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 65; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 329]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 197; Laws, 2002, ch. 534, § 7; Laws, 2010, ch. 400, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 129, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-613.
Reporting of residual votes required for elections in which ballots are generated that are counted by hand or by OMR equipment or the tabulating mechanism of a DRE unit; certain reports required for elections that use voting devices that do not generate ballots.

As used in this section “residual votes” means overvotes, undervotes and any other vote not counted for any reason.

For every election, election commissions and county and municipal executive committees shall report to the Secretary of State residual vote information; however, if the voting devices utilized in the election do not produce a ballot, other information shall be reported as required in this section.

For every election, election commissions and county and municipal executive committees responsible for the conduct of elections in which ballots are generated that are counted by hand or by OMR equipment or the tabulating mechanism of a DRE unit shall report to the Secretary of State all residual votes for all candidates and ballot measures in the elections for which they are responsible for conducting. The residual vote reports shall:

Be received by the Secretary of State no later than December 15 of the year in which the election is held;

Include any suggested explanation or suspected cause of the residual votes;

Include a copy of a voided official ballot for the election as such ballot appeared to voters at the election and copies of voided affidavit and absentee ballots if they are different from the official ballot;

Include the total voter turnout for each election to be determined by totaling the number of persons signing the receipt book at each precinct, absentee voters and persons who voted by affidavit ballot and persons whose ballots were challenged and rejected; and

Include a copy of any printed voting instructions given or visible to voters in the election and a description of any verbal instructions and any other evidence of voter education that was used in the election.

For every election, election commissions and county and municipal executive committees responsible for the conduct of election in which voting devices are used that do not generate ballots that are counted by hand or by OMR equipment or the tabulating mechanism of a DRE unit, shall file a report with the Secretary of State which shall:

Be received by the Secretary of State no later than December 15 of the year in which the election is held;

Include the total voter turnout for each election to be determined by totaling the number of persons signing the receipt book at each precinct, absentee voters and persons who voted by affidavit ballot and persons whose ballots were challenged and rejected;

Include in the report any anecdotal information obtained concerning voter problems with the voting equipment or ballot layout;

Include in the report any suggested explanation or suspected cause of any difference in the amount of total voter turnout and the number of counted votes for candidates for various offices; and

Include a copy of any printed voting instructions given or visible to voters in the election and a description of any verbal instructions and any other evidence of voter education that was used in the election.

Not later than January 31 of the year following the election, the Secretary of State shall submit a report to the Governor, Lieutenant Governor and Speaker of the House of Representatives analyzing the reports required to be filed pursuant to this section. The analysis shall include the following:

The performance of each voting device type used in the election;

Any problems with voter or poll worker instructions or ballot design and layout that have been identified as a result of analyzing the reports received;

Recommendations for reducing the number of residual votes reported; and

Such other information as the Secretary of State deems beneficial.

The reports required pursuant to this section shall be in such form as may be required by rules and regulations promulgated by the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 534, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 130, eff from and after July 1, 2017.